Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-105
State symbol and slogan; adoption.

The following is hereby adopted as the official symbol and slogan for the State of Nebraska:

Laws 1963, c. 533, § 1, p. 1678;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-716.01.